Georgia, session 2025_26, HB417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-3-411 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
regarding tuition equalization grants at private colleges and universities, is amended by
revising division (2)(B)(i) as follows:
"(B)(i) A qualified proprietary institution of higher education located in this state
which is a baccalaureate degree-granting institution of higher education; which is
accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges as a Level VI institution; which is not a Bible school or college (or, at the
graduate level, a school or college of theology or divinity); which admits as regular
students only persons who have a high school diploma, a state approved high school
equivalency (HSE) diploma, or a degree from an accredited postsecondary institution;
H. B. 417
- 1 -

LC 61 0085
whose students are eligible to participate in the federal Pell Grant program; which has
been reviewed and approved for operation and for receipt of tuition equalization grant
funds by the Georgia Nonpublic Postsecondary Education Commission; which is
domiciled and incorporated in the State of Georgia; which has been in existence in the
State of Georgia for at least ten years located in this state since on or before January
1, 2021; and which met all of the requirements of this subparagraph by January 1,
2011 2021; provided, however, that the criteria for approval for receipt of tuition
equalization grant funds shall include but not be limited to areas of course study,;
quality of academic instruction,; student placement rate,; research and library sources,
resources; faculty,; support staff,; financial resources,; physical plant facilities
resources, instructional campuses, facilities, or other physical sites; and support and
equipment resources."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 417
- 2 -